Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB428.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. The Judicial Branch Budget is as follows:
PART I
OPERATING BUDGET
(1) Funds Appropriations: There is appropriated out of the General Fund,
Restricted Funds accounts, or Federal Funds accounts for the fiscal year beginning July 1,
2025, and ending June 30, 2026, and for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and
ending June 30, 2027, and for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and ending June 30,
2028, the following sums to be used for the purposes of the Judicial Branch of the
government of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, including the Supreme Court, Court of
Appeals, Circuit Court, Family Court, District Court, the Administrative Office of the
Courts, Judicial Retirement, Local Facilities Fund, Local Facilities Use Allowance
Contingency Fund, and for services performed by the Circuit Court Clerks' offices,
including both Circuit and District Court support.
A. JUDICIAL BRANCH
Budget Units
1. COURT OF JUSTICE
a. Court Operations and Administration
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 406,082,200 411,796,400
Restricted Funds 61,311,000 61,848,600
Federal Funds 1,706,300 1,524,900
TOTAL 469,099,500 475,169,900
Page 1 of 11
XXXX 1/13/2026 5:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1371
(1) Defined Calculations: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$4,775,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $8,571,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide
funds for the increase in the employer cost of health and life insurance.
(2) Annual Increment: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$2,367,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,757,700 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for a one
percent annual increment in each year of the biennium for elected and non-elected
personnel.
(3) Full Funding of Current Services: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $13,541,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $13,541,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 to fully fund current services in this appropriation unit.
(4) Compensation Plan: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$37,050,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $37,050,300 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to
increase compensation in the Judicial Branch for eligible employees and elected and non-
elected personnel at the discretion of the Chief Justice.
Any increase in creditable compensation resulting from the pay raises provided by
this subsection shall be exempt from reduction under KRS 61.598, and the pay raises
shall be fully used to determine the member’s creditable compensation, final
compensation, and resulting retirement benefits, regardless of the member’s actual
retirement date or the system from which the member retires.
(5) Funds Required to Maintain Mandated Services: Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $8,780,200 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $8,418,500 in
fiscal year 2027-2028 to maintain mandated services.
(6) Replacement of Restricted Funds: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $7,945,200 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $7,945,200 in fiscal year 2027-
2028 to move all deputy clerks funded out of master commissioner excess fees to the
General Fund.
(7) AED/Medical Kits: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 1/13/2026 5:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1371
$1,562,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,562,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide
AED and Medical Kits in court-occupied facilities.
(8) Additional positions - Administrative Office of the Courts: Included in the
above General Fund appropriation is $1,084,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,038,900
in fiscal year 2027-2028 for 12 additional positions for the Administrative Office of the
Courts.
(9) Additional positions - Deputy Clerks: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $1,258,800 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,193,800 in fiscal year 2027-
2028 for 17 additional deputy clerk positions.
(10) Civil Filing Fees: Pursuant to its authority, if the Supreme Court retains the
increases in civil filing fees that were effective in 2008 and 2018, the additional income
resulting from the fee increases, not to exceed $15,468,100 in each fiscal year, shall be
deposited into a trust and agency account for court operations and salaries for non-elected
personnel. Any revenue generated by these increases in excess of the $15,468,100 in each
fiscal year shall be deposited into the General Fund.
b. Local Facilities Fund
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 8,910,400 156,279,000 162,867,800
(1) Uninsured Costs Due to Flooding: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $8,910,400 in fiscal year 2025-2026 for file restoration, remediation, and
repairs due to flooding in Franklin and Hardin Counties.
(2) Local Facility Projects: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$13,652,200 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the use allowance for five judicial
centers authorized by the 2024 General Assembly.
(3) Full Funding of Current Services: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $2,628,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,628,100 in fiscal year 2027-
2028 to fully fund current services.
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 1/13/2026 5:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1371
(4) Operating Paid to Counties: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $2,076,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,276,700 in fiscal year 2027-
2028 for inflationary increase on operating expenses paid to counties.
(5) Insurance on Building Contents: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $448,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $448,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028
to purchase insurance to cover remediation and restoration of paper court records in each
court facility.
(6) Boyle County Temporary Space and Fit-up: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $5,260,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $260,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 for leased space and fit-up for all court and clerk functions.
(7) Bell County Temporary Space and Fit-up: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $3,120,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $120,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 for leased space and fit-up for all court and clerk functions.
(8) Bell County Use Allowance and Equipment: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $2,806,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to support use allowance and
equipment and $2,056,100 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support use allowance.
(9) Indirect Rate Paid to Counties: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $5,501,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $5,831,600 in fiscal year 2027-
2028 to compensate counties for operating and maintaining court facilities.
(10) Jefferson County Offsite Archive: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $994,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $150,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028
for leased space and a storage system for archiving boxes.
(11) Local Court Facility Compensation: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation are moneys to compensate local units of government for providing court
space and for costs incurred in the development of local court facilities as defined in KRS
Chapter 26A and provided in Part II of this Act and to perform all other acts required or
authorized by KRS Chapter 26A.
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 1/13/2026 5:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1371
(12) Use Allowance Payments to Counties: Pursuant to KRS 26A.090(2),
beginning with court facility construction or renovation projects authorized by the 2000
Regular Session of the General Assembly and all subsequent court facility projects, use
allowance payments are restricted to the court's proportional share of the annual principal
and interest costs in connection with the construction or renovation of the facility, not to
exceed the authorized annual use allowance.
(13) Court Facility Maintenance Fund: (a) Notwithstanding KRS
26A.090(2), when there is no debt on court facility construction or renovation projects
authorized prior to the 2000 Regular Session of the General Assembly, use allowance is
restricted to compensation equal to two percent annually of capital costs to be paid to the
county unit of government and two percent annually to be retained by the Administrative
Office of the Courts and directed to a separate fund specifically for maintenance of court
facilities.
(b) The fund created pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be used for
routine, ongoing, planned, and unanticipated maintenance for court facilities.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 45.750, any maintenance project estimated to cost
$3,000,000 or less for a local court facility is not considered to be a capital project
requiring authorization of the General Assembly in the Judicial Branch budget bill and
may be completed using funds appropriated to the Judicial Branch for maintenance of
local facilities or other agency funds of the Judicial Branch.
c. Local Facilities Use Allowance Contingency Fund
(1) Funds Carry Forward: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unexpended
balance remaining at the close of fiscal year 2025-2026 shall not lapse and shall continue
into fiscal year 2026-2027, and any unexpended balance remaining at the close of fiscal
year 2026-2027 shall not lapse and shall continue into fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide
for cost overruns in authorized court facilities projects not to exceed 15 percent of the use
allowance in accordance with KRS Chapter 26A.
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 1/13/2026 5:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1371
TOTAL – COURT OF JUSTICE
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 8,910,400 562,361,200 577,664,200
Restricted Funds -0- 61,311,000 61,848,600
Federal Funds -0- 1,706,300 1,524,900
TOTAL 8,910,400 625,378,500 638,037,700
2. JUDICIAL RETIREMENT SYSTEM
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 643,000 647,300
TOTAL 643,000 647,300
(1) Administrative Expenses: Pursuant to KRS 21.540, administrative expenses
shall be paid out of an administrative account which shall be funded by transfers of the
necessary moneys, in appropriate ratio, from the funds described in KRS 21.550 and
21.560.
(2) Pension Benefit Increase: Notwithstanding KRS 21.405(5), no pension
benefit increase shall be granted to recipients of a retirement allowance under KRS
21.345 to 21.580 on July 1, 2026, or July 1, 2027.
TOTAL - JUDICIAL BRANCH
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 8,910,400 562,361,700 574,664,200
Restricted Funds -0- 61,954,000 62,495,900
Federal Funds -0- 1,706,300 1,524,900
TOTAL 8,910,400 626,021,500 638,685,000
PART II
CAPITAL PROJECTS BUDGET
(1) Authorization of Capital Projects: It is the intent of the General Assembly
that any capital project proposed by any state government entity, including the agencies
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 1/13/2026 5:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1371
and subdivisions of the Court of Justice, shall be authorized by the General Assembly
prior to the project’s financing and construction, in accordance with KRS 7A.010,
7A.120, 45.750, 45.760, 45.763, 45.765, and 48.110. Pursuant to KRS 45.760(1), the
amount allotted, from all sources, for expenditure on any capital project, including leases
as defined by KRS 45.750, shall not exceed the estimated cost as shown in this Act.
(2) Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee: Capital construction
projects and major items of equipment that are not specifically listed in this Act may be
authorized only after submission of the project to the Capital Projects and Bond
Oversight Committee and in accordance with the other requirements of KRS 45.760(7).
Moneys may be transferred to the allotment account of any capital project only after
submission of the project to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee and in
accordance with the other requirements of KRS 45.760(6). As required by KRS 45.760,
all capital construction items authorized in this Act shall be constructed in accordance
with this Act, supporting documentation considered by the General Assembly, and
Judicial Branch budget records. Any modifications to the scope of a capital construction
project or to a lease shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight
Committee before execution.
(3) Deferred Funding: (a) General Fund support to provide operating costs
of $1,911,000 and $3,000,000 for nonrecurring equipment and furniture for five projects
authorized by the 2024 General Assembly is deferred to the 2028-2030 fiscal biennium.
(b) General Fund support to provide operating costs totaling $301,200 and
annualized use allowance totaling $3,231,000 and $750,000 for nonrecurring equipment
and furniture costs for the Spencer County project is deferred to the 2028-2030 fiscal
biennium.
(c) General Fund support to provide operating costs totaling $444,000 and
annualized use allowance totaling $4,734,000 and $1,000,000 for nonrecurring
equipment and furniture costs for the Boyle County project is deferred to the 2028-2030
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 1/13/2026 5:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1371
fiscal biennium.
(d) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the projects in paragraphs (a), (b),
and (c) of this subsection shall be funded using resources previously appropriated for
projects that no longer require use allowance debt payments in the 2028-2030 fiscal
biennium.
(4) Local Facilities Use Allowance Contingency Fund: For any court facility
project which is occupied and use allowance funding is insufficient, the use allowance
payments shall be approved from the Local Facilities Use Allowance Contingency Fund.
If funds are not available in the Local Facilities Use Allowance Contingency Fund, the
Chief Justice may transfer funds from other Judicial Branch accounts in accordance with
Part III, General Provisions, Section 7. of this Act to make the necessary payments.
A. JUDICIAL BRANCH
Budget Units
1. LOCAL FACILITIES FUND 2026-27 2027-28
Project
001. Spencer County (Project Scope: $33,661,000)
002. Boyle County (Project Scope: $49,236,000)
003. Bell County - Renovation (Project Scope: $20,910,000)
004. Maintenance Pool - Renovations $41,800,000 -0-
005. Maintenance Pool - Security $3,000,000 -0-
2. LEASE AUTHORIZATIONS
001. Jefferson County - Lease - Parking
PART III
GENERAL PROVISIONS
1. Expenditure Authority: The Director of the Administrative Office of the
Courts, with the approval of the Chief Justice, may expend any of the funds appropriated
for court operations and administration in any lawful manner and for any legal purpose
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 1/13/2026 5:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1371
that the Chief Justice shall authorize or direct. No executive agency of state government
shall have the power to restrict or limit the expenditure of funds appropriated to the
Judicial Branch of government.
2. Severability of Budget Provisions: Appropriation items and sums in this Act
conform to KRS 48.311. If any section, any subsection, or any provision thereof shall be
invalid or unconstitutional, the decision of the courts shall not affect or impair any of the
remaining sections, subsections, or provisions.
3. Duplicate Appropriations: Any appropriation item and sum in this Act and
in an appropriation provision in another Act of the 2026 Regular Session of the General
Assembly which constitutes a duplicate appropriation shall be governed by KRS 48.312.
4. Priority of Individual Appropriations: KRS 48.313 shall control when a
total or subtotal figure in this Act conflicts with the sum of the appropriations of which it
consists.
5. Carry Forward of Funds: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unexpended
balance remaining at the close of the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027,
and June 30, 2028, shall not lapse and shall continue into the next fiscal year.
6. Final Budget Document: The Director of the Administrative Office of the
Courts shall prepare a final budget document reflecting the 2026-2028 biennial budget of
the Court of Justice. A copy shall be provided to the Legislative Research Commission,
and an informational copy shall be furnished to the Finance and Administration Cabinet,
within 60 days of the adjournment of the 2026 Regular Session of the General Assembly.
7. Transferability of Funds: The Chief Justice of the Commonwealth of
Kentucky shall have the ability to transfer funds to other programs and budget units
within the Judicial Branch. Any funds transferred to other budget units within the Judicial
Branch may be used to support any activity, program, or operation of the budget unit or
program receiving the respective funds.
8. Appropriations Revisions: Proposed revisions to General Fund, Restricted
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 1/13/2026 5:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1371
Funds, and Federal Funds appropriations in this Act shall be made and reported to the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue pursuant to KRS 48.630(10).
The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall notify, on a timely basis, the
Legislative Research Commission of the most current estimates of anticipated receipts for
the affected fiscal year and an accompanying statement which explains variations from
the anticipated amount.
9. Maximum Salary of Trial Commissioners: Pursuant to KRS 24A.100(3),
no trial commissioner shall be compensated at a rate greater than $7,200. No funding is
provided for trial commissioners commissioned in counties with a residing District Judge.
10. Debt Restructuring: Notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky
Revised Statutes, use allowance payments shall not be amended to reflect debt
restructuring transactions undertaken by a county during the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
11. Court Facility Maintenance Fund Report: For each of the periods ending
June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028, the Director of the Administrative
Office of the Courts shall prepare a court facility maintenance report. This report shall
detail all court facility maintenance undertaken by the Court of Justice, to include any
cost-sharing with counties, as well as detail regarding future maintenance needs. This
report shall include a statewide expenditure summary followed by individual county
expenditures detailing the state's and county's respective share of expenditures. The
Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide this report to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by September 15 of each fiscal year.
12. Court of Justice Reserve Account: Notwithstanding KRS 27A.055(4),
expenditures may be made effective immediately from the Court of Justice Reserve
Account at the discretion of the Chief Justice.
PART IV
BUDGET REDUCTION OR SURPLUS EXPENDITURE PLAN
The Judicial Branch shall participate in any Budget Reduction Plan or Surplus
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 1/13/2026 5:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1371
Expenditure Plan in accordance with KRS Chapter 48, except that obligations essential to
the constitutional duties and use allowance of the Judicial Branch shall be exempt from
any Budget Reduction Plan. The level of participation in a Budget Reduction Plan shall
be at the discretion of the Chief Justice and shall not exceed the actual percentage of
revenue shortfall.
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 1/13/2026 5:14 PM Jacketed